Hawaii statutes.
§706-660 Sentence of imprisonment for class
B and C felonies; ordinary terms; discretionary terms. (1) Except as
provided in subsection (2), a person who has been convicted of a class B or
class C felony may be sentenced to an indeterminate term of imprisonment except
as provided for in section 706-660.1 relating to the use of firearms in certain
felony offenses and section 706-606.5 relating to repeat offenders. When
ordering such a sentence, the court shall impose the maximum length of
imprisonment which shall be as follows:

(a) For a class B felony--ten years; and

(b) For a class C felony--five years.

The minimum length of imprisonment shall be
determined by the Hawaii paroling authority in accordance with section 706-669.

(2) A person who has been convicted of a class
B or class C felony for any offense under part IV of chapter 712 may be
sentenced to an indeterminate term of imprisonment; provided that this
subsection shall not apply to sentences imposed under sections 706-606.5,
706-660.1, 712-1240.5, 712-1240.8 as that section was in effect prior to July
1, 2016, 712-1242, 712-1245, 712-1249.5, 712‑1249.6, 712-1249.7, and
712-1257.

When ordering a sentence under this subsection,
the court shall impose a term of imprisonment, which shall be as follows:

(a) For a class B felony--ten years or less, but not
less than five years; and

(b) For a class C felony--five years or less, but
not less than one year.

The minimum length of imprisonment shall be
determined by the Hawaii paroling authority in accordance with section 706-669.
[L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1976, c 92, §8 and c 204, §2; am L 1980, c 294,
§2; am L 1986, c 314, §38; am L 2013, c 280, §2; am L 2016, c 231, §29]

COMMENTARY ON §706-660

This section embodies three important policy determinations
of the Code.

With the exception of special problems calling for extended
terms of incarceration as provided in subsequent sections, it provides for only
one possible maximum length of imprisonment for each class of felony. Assuming
care is used in designating the grade and class of each offense, this should go
a long way in ameliorating the variety of inconsistent sentences previously
authorized.

In 1965, the legislature enacted a law designed to end
judicially imposed inconsistent sentences of imprisonment.[1] This policy
known as true indeterminate sentencing is continued. The court's discretion is
limited to choosing between imprisonment and other modes of sentencing. Once
the court has decided to sentence a felon to imprisonment, the actual time of
release is determined by parole authorities. Having decided on imprisonment,
the court must then impose the maximum term authorized.[2] The concept is
accepted in California[3] and is being proposed in Michigan.[4] This policy is
also in substantial accord with the proposed A.B.A. Standards on sentencing.[5]

Inevitably, there will remain some disparity arising from the
fact that some judges will be more strongly inclined toward granting probation
(or other non-imprisonment disposition) than others. The criteria set forth in
part II of this chapter, for withholding a sentence of imprisonment, are
intended to alleviate this disparity somewhat. Moreover, §706-669, governing
the procedure for determining the actual minimum time to be served, provides
that the parole board must make an initial determination as soon as practicable
but, in any event, no later than six months following commitment. Thus,
"[g]rossly inappropriate denial[s] of probation can in most instances be
cured fairly promptly through parole, if the circumstances favoring release are
evident...."[6]

Finally, this section embodies a policy of differentiating
exceptional problems calling for extended terms of imprisonment[7] from the
problems which the vast majority of offenders present. Most of the felony
sentences previously authorized in Hawaii were clearly intended to encompass
the most dangerous offender. The uniform application of a sentence designed to
encompass exceptional cases seems clearly unwarranted in the cases presented by
the vast majority of offenders. This is borne out by the A.B.A.'s recent
study:

...[M]any
sentences authorized by statute in this country are, by comparison to other
countries and in terms of the needs of the public, excessively long for the
vast majority of cases. Their length is undoubtedly the product of concern for
protection against the most exceptional cases, most notably the particularly
dangerous offender and the professional criminal. It would be more desirable
for the penal code to differentiate explicitly between most offenders and such
exceptional cases, by providing lower, more realistic sentences for the former
and authorizing a special term for the latter.[8]

The sentences provided in this section, when compared to the
extended sentences authorized in subsequent sections, seek to achieve the
recommended explicit differentiation.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §706-660

Act 204, Session Laws 1976, amended the first sentence by
adding the exception excluding persons convicted of felonies involving
firearms. In its report, the Conference Committee states that it "intends
to require the court in cases of felonies where a firearm was used to impose a
mandatory term of imprisonment" and that nothing contained in the bill
"should be construed as precluding (a) the court from imposing an
indeterminate sentence or an extended indeterminate sentence, or (b) the Hawaii
paroling authority from fixing the minimum term of imprisonment at a length
greater than the term of imprisonment provided for in this bill [706-660.1]."
Conference Committee Report Nos. 34 and 35.

Act 294, Session Laws 1980, restricted this section to
sentences for class B and C felonies, eliminating provisions relating to class
A felonies. For class A felonies, see §706-659.

Act 280, Session Laws 2013, amended this section by granting
a sentencing court the discretion to sentence a defendant convicted of a class
B or class C felony drug offense to a prison sentence of a length appropriate
to the defendant's particular offense and underlying circumstances.
Specifically, this Act allows a court to impose a sentence of imprisonment for
certain class B felonies for not less than five years, and a sentence of
imprisonment for certain class C felonies for not less than one year. The
legislature found that state mandatory minimum sentencing laws are being
challenged across the nation because these laws mandate longer prison sentences
regardless of whether the sentencing court believes the punishment is
appropriate based on the circumstances and facts of the case. Studies have
shown that mandatory minimum sentencing of drug users causes an increase in
incarceration costs and have a disproportionate impact on women and certain
racial and ethnic groups. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 496, House
Standing Committee Report No. 1464.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended subsection (2) to
implement recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened
pursuant to House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Case Notes

Because criminal solicitation to commit first degree murder
is a crime declared to be a felony without specification of class within
meaning of §706-610, it is a class C felony for sentencing purposes, subject to
the sentencing provisions of this section. 84 H. 229, 933 P.2d 66 (1997).

For sentencing purposes, conspiracy to commit second degree
murder is a class C felony under §706-610 and subject to the sentencing
provisions of this section, not §706-656. 84 H. 280, 933 P.2d 617 (1997).

Where defendant was convicted by the jury of five
first-degree thefts, each of which defendant was sentenced to ten years'
incarceration, and pursuant to this section and §706-668.5, five ten-year terms
running consecutively was the statutory maximum, defendant's sentence did not
deprive defendant of defendant's right to a jury trial as interpreted by the
U.S. Supreme Court in Apprendi and Blakely. 111 H. 267, 141 P.3d 440 (2006).

Upon revocation of probation pursuant to §706-625(3), in
light of the record, §706-621 and this section, trial court did not abuse its
discretion in sentencing defendant to imprisonment "for a term of not more
than ten years with credit for time served". 97 H. 135 (App.), 34 P.3d
1034 (2001).

Cited: 56 H. 628, 548 P.2d 632 (1976).

__________

§706-660 Commentary:

1. See H.R.S. §711-76.

2. It must, however, be remembered that the Code grants the
court the power to impose an extended term of imprisonment (see §706-661).

3. Cal. Pen. Code §1168.

4. Prop. Mich. Rev. Cr. Code §1401.

5. A.B.A. Standards §3.2.

6. Prop. Mich. Rev. Cr. Code, comments at 130.

7. Cf. §706-661.

8. A.B.A. Standards §2.5.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next